Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF3337.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin CONSTITUTIONAL AMENDMENT PROPOSED.new text end new text begin An amendment to the Minnesota Constitution is proposed to the people. If the amendment is adopted, a section shall be added to article XIII, to read: new text end new text begin Sec. 13. new text end new text begin Sports betting is not prohibited in this state, provided that organized, commercialized, or systematic sports betting may only be conducted by a federally recognized Indian Tribe conducting class III gaming under a Tribal-state gaming compact or a racetrack licensed by the state to conduct pari-mutuel horse racing. Sports betting may only be conducted as provided by law and the legislature must timely enact a system of regulation for the conduct of sports betting. A tax on sports betting must be imposed by law at a rate of 20 percent on the amounts wagered, less the winnings paid to individuals placing wagers. The legislature must appropriate revenues from the tax in equal shares to fund substance use disorder programs, local charitable organizations funded by donations from licensed lawful gambling organizations, pari-mutuel horse racing purses, and the state general fund. new text end Sec. 2. new text begin SUBMISSION TO VOTERS.new text end new text begin The proposed amendment must be submitted to the people at the 2026 general election. The question submitted must be: new text end new text begin "Shall the Minnesota Constitution be amended to legalize sports betting only if conducted by an Indian Tribe in Minnesota or horse racing track, to tax sports betting, and to use the tax revenue to fund substance use disorder programs, local charitable organizations, horse racing purses, and the state general fund? new text end new text begin Yes . new text end new text begin No . new text end new text begin " new text end